Utah statutes.
77-10a-15.   Return and transfer of indictment.

Immediately upon the return of an indictment the managing judge shall enter an order transferring the indictment to a court with appropriate jurisdiction and proper venue under Section 76-1-202 to try the matter.



Enacted by Chapter 318, 1990 General Session

